Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 7 Recreational Vehicle Parks and Campgrounds Act

32-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Recreational Vehicle Parks and Campgrounds Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared that:

The freedom to travel is among America’s most cherished liberties and the recreational vehicle and automobile are key modes of travel for those enjoying this freedom.

Recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds provide secure places of refuge for recreational vehicle users and campers.

A comprehensive set of standards for recreational vehicle park and campground development and operation has been developed by nationally recognized organizations and institutions and these standards provide adequately for the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

The public interest and safety are best served by having uniform standards for recreational vehicle park and campground development and operation from state to state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-3.
Legislative intent and purpose.

The legislative intent and purpose of this chapter are:

To provide a safe environment in urban, rural, and wilderness settings that will accommodate the full range of camping units desired by the consumer;

To allow the greatest latitude in designing recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds according to the desires of the recreational vehicle and camping public, while protecting the health and safety needs of that public;

To ensure that local government has the right and the duty to regulate zoning for recreational vehicle parks or campgrounds; and that the state has the right and the duty to regulate those building, plumbing, and fire protection elements for which national standards have been adopted under this code;

To meet the overall spirit of national codes adopted in this chapter by reference. Where slight differences in wording occur between this chapter and those of national codes, those differences are not intended to change the public health and safety goals of the national codes, but rather to foster consistency between code language and the terminology of the recreational vehicle park and campground industry and the recreational vehicle and camping public; and

To provide rules, regulations, requirements, and standards for the development of recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds in the state of Rhode Island for purposes of ensuring the following:

Protection of the public health, safety, and general welfare;

Orderly growth and development, in conjunction with conservation, protection, and proper use of land;

Proper provisions for all public facilities; and

Appropriate local government control over the zoning and location of recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds in individual communities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-4.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds, as defined in §

32-7-7

. No person or organization or government entity shall establish and maintain a recreational vehicle park or campground within the state of Rhode Island, except in conformity with this code. Facilities in existing recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds may continue in use, providing those facilities do not constitute a recognized health or safety hazard.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-5.
Scope and jurisdiction.

This chapter is intended to include all elements to be regulated by the state of Rhode Island. The regulations contained in this chapter shall not supercede any applicable zoning ordinance enacted by any municipality pursuant to chapter 24 of title 45.

Where differences occur between state and local standards affecting building, electrical, plumbing, and fire protection elements, the state standards shall govern.

Any decision to regulate aspects of recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds, as they relate to zoning and location affecting offsite impacts, shall be made solely by local agencies.

Upon the construction of a recreational vehicle park or campground, enforcement of the operational requirements of this code shall be the responsibility of those agencies normally responsible for enforcing such provisions. Where disagreements arise over jurisdiction, the responsibility for enforcement shall vest with the city, then state, in that order.

Federal regulations promulgated by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration may supercede all or part of this chapter, as applied to any category of regulated motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-6.
Alternative materials, equipment and procedures.

The provisions of this chapter are not intended to prevent the use of any material, method of construction, or installation procedure not specially prescribed by this code; provided that any such alternative is of equal or greater quality and is verified by the authority having jurisdiction. The authority having jurisdiction shall require that sufficient evidence be submitted to substantiate any claims made regarding the safety of alternatives. Evidence shall also be submitted to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the authority having jurisdiction, that the alternative material, method of construction, or installation procedure meets or exceeds the level of health and safety protection required by the standards of this code.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-7.
Definitions.

The following definitions are adopted for purposes of this chapter and for use by state and local agencies. In addition to standards established by local codes and other laws of the state of Rhode Island and standards adopted by reference, the following definitions shall apply to recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds. Where differences occur between state and local definitions, this chapter shall govern:

Accessory structure: A portable, deck-like structure, not attached to the camping unit (see “add-on structure”), not to exceed four hundred (400) square feet in area, set on movable, above-ground supports such as concrete blocks, and containing no plumbing or electrical fixtures.

Accessory cabana: A portable room enclosure.

Accessory storage: A structure located on a camping unit site that is designed and used solely for the storage and use of personal equipment and possessions of the recreational vehicle user or camper and may include storage buildings and greenhouses not exceeding one hundred twenty (120) square feet of floor area.

Accessory uses: Offices, employee or operator living units, recreational facilities, grocery stores, convenience stores, gift shops, service buildings, rest rooms, dumping stations, showers, laundry facilities, storage units, and other uses and structures customarily a part of the recreational vehicle park or campground operation.

Add-on structures: Nonpermanent structures attached to the principal camping unit that provide additional space or service.

Approved: Acceptable by the “authority having jurisdiction”.

ARVC: National Association of RV Parks and Campgrounds (ARVC). The national trade organization representing the outdoor hospitality industry.

Authority having jurisdiction: The “authority having jurisdiction” is the organization, office or individual responsible for approving equipment, equipment installation, permits, or procedures.

Awning: A shade structure supported by posts or columns and partially supported by the camping unit.

Cabin/camping: A hard-sided tent or shelter less than four hundred (400) square feet in area that is on skid and/or wheels designed to facilitate relocation.

Cabin/housekeeping: A rustic cabin providing guests with full-serviced amenities as an alternative to other forms of rental lodging.

Campers: A person or persons participating in recreational vehicle use or camping.

Camping unit: A portable structure, shelter, or vehicle designed and intended for occupancy by persons engaged in recreational vehicle use or camping. The basic units include: recreational vehicles, camping cabins, housekeeping cabins, tents, teepees, yurts, and other rental accommodations for enjoyment of the outdoor experience.

Camping unit seal: A camping unit meeting the criteria set forth in either RVIA or RPTIA guidelines.

Camping unit separation: The minimum distance between a camping unit, including its add-on structures, and an adjacent camping unit and its add-on structures.

Camping unit site: A specific area within a recreational vehicle park or campground that is set aside for a camping unit.

Campground: Any parcel or tract of land under the control of any person or organization, wherein two (2) or more camping unit sites are offered to the public or members of an organization for rent or lease. Campgrounds may or may not be designed to accommodate recreational vehicles.

Primitive: A campground where no facilities are provided for the comfort or convenience of campers.

Semi-primitive: A campground where rudimentary facilities (privies and/or fireplaces) may be provided for the comfort and convenience of campers.

Developed: A campground, accessible by vehicular traffic, where sites are substantially developed; two (2) or more utilities, e.g.; sewer, water, electricity, etc., are provided; and refuse disposal and restrooms are available.

Day use: Daytime activities within a recreational vehicle park or campground for less than a twelve-hour (12) period. (See also “Site night”).

Density: The number of camping unit sites on a unit of land area.

Greenbelt: A strip of land, containing landscape or other aesthetic site-obscuring features, intended to buffer potentially incompatible uses. Greenbelts may include utilities and other underground facilities but not camping units.

Guest: An invited visitor to a recreational vehicle park or campground.

Gray Water: Discharge from fixtures, appliances, or appurtenances, in connection with a plumbing system that does not receive any fecal matter.

Minimum parcel size: The minimum land area required to accommodate a recreational vehicle park or campground.

Occupancy: The presence of guest(s) in a camping unit for a site night where rent is received.

Operator: The owner of a recreational vehicle park or campground or his or her designee.

Owner: The owner of a recreational vehicle park or campground or his or her designee.

Person: Any individual, partnership, firm, company, corporation, trustee, association, or any public or private entity.

Planning commission: The advisory body of a local jurisdiction that has authority to advise elected decision makers of a jurisdiction on land-use permits for recreational vehicle parks or campgrounds.

Public water supply: A municipal, community, or privately owned water supply system designed to distribute water to guests within a defined geographical area.

Recreation area: A specific area of land, water, or a combination of land and water, located within a recreational vehicle park or campground, and designed and intended for the use or enjoyment of guests of the recreational vehicle park or campground.

Recreational vehicle: A vehicular-type camping unit, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.2 or A119.5, and designed primarily as temporary living quarters for recreation that has either its own motive power or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The basic units are: camping trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, motor homes, park trailers, travel trailers, and truck campers.

Camping trailer: A recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, that is mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold for use.

Fifth wheel trailer: A recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle.

Motor Home: A recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle.

Park trailer: A recreational vehicle that meets the following criteria:

Built on a single chassis mounted on wheels; and

Certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.5.

Travel trailer: A recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle containing a towing mechanism that is mounted behind the tow vehicle’s bumper.

Truck camper: A recreational vehicle consisting of a roof, floor, and sides designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the back of a pickup truck.

Recreational vehicle/dependent: A recreational vehicle not containing sanitary facilities and/or devices for connecting such facilities to a community waste disposal system.

Recreational vehicle/independent: A recreational vehicle containing sanitary facilities and devices for connecting such facilities to a community waste disposal system. This type of recreational vehicle is also referred to as a self-contained, recreational vehicle.

Recreational vehicle/gross trailer area: The total plan area of the recreational vehicle, not to exceed four hundred (400) square feet (HUD Interpretive Bulletin 3282.8). Storage lofts contained within the basic unit that have ceiling heights less than five (5) feet at the peak of the roof do not constitute additional square footage.

Recreational vehicle park: Any parcel or tract of land under the control of any person or organization, wherein two (2) or more camping unit sites are offered to the public or members of an organization for rent or lease, including park-owned recreational vehicles held out for rent. Recreational vehicle parks are designed primarily to accommodate recreational vehicles (See also “Campground”).

Ownership/membership and specialty: A recreational vehicle park or campground that is opened to members or owners only or where the sites are individually owned. This category also includes recreational vehicle parks or campgrounds that are owned by, or cater to, specific audiences such as religious groups, square dancers, and clothing optional clubs.

Destination: A recreational vehicle park or campground containing facilities (e.g., swimming pools, restaurants, golf courses, formal recreational programs, etc.) and catering to recreational vehicle users or campers who typically travel extended distances to stay for extended periods.

Extended stay: A recreational vehicle park or campground that provides extended stay, full-time, and seasonal accommodations, rather than short-term accommodations.

Senior adult: A recreational vehicle park or campground for the exclusive use of senior individuals, fifty-five (55) years of age or older, that complies with the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development Fair Housing Act.

Traveler: A recreational vehicle park or campground where recreational vehicle users and campers stay for a day or a week, as an alternative to other types of lodging, while traveling or vacationing or enjoying the local attractions within a given area.

Rent: Compensation or other consideration given for a prescribed right, use, possession, or occupancy of recreational vehicle park or campground, as defined by the operator.

Rental on-site: A camping unit placed within a recreational vehicle park or campground that is available for rental to guests.

Recreational vehicle users: Individuals who use recreational vehicles, including, but not limited to, the following categories:

Daily/overnight: Recreational vehicle users and campers who stay for a day or a week, as an alternative to other types of lodging. Typically travelers, visitors, or tourists enjoying local attractions in a given area.

Extended stay: Recreational vehicle users and campers who stay in a given recreational vehicle park or campground for an extended period of time. The term “extended stay” generally describes the following groups:

Individuals who choose a recreationally centered lifestyle and who stay in a specific location for a traditional season (see seasonals, snowbirds, and sunbirds).

Individuals who choose a recreational vehicle as interim lodging, while transferring to a new locality or awaiting construction of conventional housing.

Individuals who relocate frequently for employment purposes, and choose a recreational vehicle as lodging.

Individuals who choose a recreational vehicle as a housing alternative for extended periods of time.

Full-time: Individuals who opt, because of recreational and/or economic benefits, to use their recreational vehicle as their only or primary residence.

Seasonal: Individuals who typically leave their recreational vehicle at a specific recreational vehicle park or campground for a season and occupy their recreational vehicles from time to time during that season.

Sanitary disposal station: A facility for the emptying of the waste-holding tanks of recreational vehicles.

Service building: A structure or portion thereof that is used to house sanitary facilities, such as water closets, lavatories, and other facilities, for the convenience of the recreational vehicle park or campground guest.

Sewage: Any liquid waste containing animal or vegetable matter suspension or solution, or the water-carried wastes resulting from the discharge of water closets, or any other source of water-carried waste of human origin containing putrescible material.

Shall: Indicates a mandatory requirement.

Should: Indicates a recommendation, not a requirement.

Site: That portion of a recreational vehicle park or campground specifically intended for the use of one camping unit.

Site night: The equivalent of one camping unit occupying one site for one overnight stay whether occupied or not.

Slideout: An extended portion of a recreational vehicle that exceeds the allowable dimensions in the traveling mode.

Utility connection assembly: A single hookup assembly located on the site and containing connections for any or all of the following: water, sewer, electrical power, phone, or television.

Watering station: A facility for supplying potable water to recreational vehicle users and campers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 56.

32-7-8.
Design and construction standards.

Standards set forth in the following documents are adopted by reference in this chapter: ANSI A119.2; ANSI 119.5; NFPA 501D; and HUD Interpretive Bulletin 3282.8.

Recreational vehicles must comply with ANSI A119.2 or A119.5 and as further described in HUD Interpretive Bulletin 3282.8 must be primarily designed as temporary lodging for recreation that has either its own motive power or is mounted or towed by another vehicle, and does not exceed four hundred (400) square feet in area. Every service building or building used for accessory services in a recreational vehicle park or campground shall be designed and constructed in accordance with applicable building codes and standards. Each camper unit shall be allowed accessory and/or add-on structures, provided these structures are not permanent.

Applicable standards include the following:

Density: Average density should not exceed twenty-five (25) camping unit sites per acre of land.

Camping unit separation: A camping unit and its accessory structures should not be located less than ten (10) feet from any other camping unit and its accessory structures or less than ten (10) feet from any permanent building within or adjacent to the recreational vehicle park or campground.

Site identification: Each camping unit site shall be identified by easily readable markers.

Utility connection assembly: When potable water connection, sewer inlet connection, electrical power, television connection, and phone connection supply or discharge outlets are provided for an individual recreational vehicle site, they may be grouped together.

Swimming and bathing facilities: If provided, such facilities shall be designed in accordance with the requirements of the authority having jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-9.
Fire safety standards.

In addition to standards contained in the Uniform Fire Code and the referenced NFPA standards, the following standards shall apply to recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds:

Campfires: Designated outdoor campfire locations, if provided, shall be in safe, convenient areas where they will not constitute fire hazards to vegetation, undergrowth, trees, and camping units.

Refuse: Areas under and around camping units shall be kept free from accumulation of refuse. To that end, a refuse disposal system shall be provided. The burning of refuse, when permitted, shall take place only in approved incinerators.

Filling LP gas containers: The filling of LP gas containers shall conform to NFPA 58, Standard for the Storage and Handling of Petroleum Gases, or be in conformance with guidelines established by the authority having jurisdiction.

Fire extinguishers: Portable fire extinguishers provided by the park operator shall be of the multipurpose dry chemical type or its equal. Such extinguishers shall have a minimum rating of 2A:20Band shall be installed in accordance with NFPA 10, Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-10.
Water supply standards.

The following standards shall apply to recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds:

Potable water supply and distribution:

The supply or supplies of potable water shall comply with the applicable potable water standards of the authority having jurisdiction or, in the absence thereof, shall meet the intent of the Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974 (public law 93-523 as amended (1986)) [42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.].

Where the recreational vehicle park or campground has its own water supply system, the components of the system shall be approved by the authority having jurisdiction. Further, there shall be a source protection buffer area of at least two hundred (200) feet surrounding each such supply.

Potable water systems, if provided for filling recreational vehicle potable water tanks, shall be located at least fifty (50) feet from any waste disposal station. When such a system is provided, a sign of durable material, not less than two (2) by two (2) feet in area, shall be posted adjacent to the potable water outlet. Such sign shall be inscribed in clearly legible letters with the following: “POTABLE WATER NOT TO BE USED FOR FLUSHING WASTE TANKS,” or other similar warning. For the purpose of this subsection, a potable watering system shall mean a tap and not the source.

The potable water system should be protected from back-flow by means of a listed vacuum breaker located downstream from each connection.

Water supplies for fire protection: Water supplies for fire protection purposes shall meet the requirements of the authority having jurisdiction.

Prohibited connections: The potable water supply shall not be connected to any nonpotable or unapproved water supply.

Potable water connections at individual camping unit sites: All wells, springs, and similar sources of water intended for potable purposes shall be properly constructed, located, and protected to exclude surface contamination and to minimize the potential of contamination from sanitary hazards.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-11.
Sanitary conveniences.

The following standards shall apply to recreational vehicle parks and campgrounds. All sanitary conveniences shall be installed in accordance with this code:

Sewage facility approval: Each sewage disposal system material and design layout shall be approved by the authority having jurisdiction.

Material and design: Flow rates shall be calculated at a rate of sixty (60) gallons per site per day for individually sewered sites.

Sewer inlet connections at individual recreational vehicle unit sites:

When provided, the sewer connections for individual recreational vehicle sites shall be located so as to minimize damage by the parking of recreational vehicles or automobiles.

The connection shall consist of an inlet extending vertically to grade. The minimum diameter of the sewer inlet shall be four (4) inches and shall be provided with a four-inch (4) inlet or a minimum three-inch (3) fitting.

The sewer inlet pipe shall be firmly imbedded in the ground and be protected against damage from heaving or shifting and the entrance of surface water. It shall be provided with a tight-fitting plug or cap to be used when the site is vacant.

The sewer inlet pipe shall not be required to be individually vented, regardless of the use of the traps at each inlet.

A drain connector shall be sealed and fitted to the camping unit inlet connector.

Recreational vehicle sanitary disposal stations:

One recreational vehicle sanitary disposal station shall be provided for each one hundred (100) recreational vehicle sites, or parts thereof, that are not equipped with individual sewer connections.

Each station, where provided, shall be convenient to access from the service driveway and shall provide easy ingress and egress for recreational vehicles.

Unless other approved means are used, each station shall have a concrete slab with a center drain inlet located so as to be on the driveway (left) side of the recreational vehicle.

The slab shall be not less than three (3) feet by three (3) feet, at least three and one-half (31/2) inches thick, and properly reinforced, the surface of which is trowelled to a smooth finish and sloped from each side inward to a sewer inlet.

The sewer inlet shall consist of a four-inch (4), self-closing, foot-operated hatch of approved material with a tight-fitting cover. The hatch body shall be set in the concrete of the slab with the lip of the opening flush with its surface to facilitate the cleansing of the slab with water. The hatch shall be properly connected to a sewer inlet that shall discharge to an approved sanitary sewage disposal facility constructed in accordance with ANSI A119.4 section 4-8.1.

Holding tank flushing facilities: Where holding tank flushing facilities are provided by the operator, the following standards shall apply:

Holding tank flushing facilities shall consist of piped supply of water under pressure, terminating in a valved outlet located and installed to minimize damage by automobiles or recreational vehicles. The flushing device shall consist of a properly supported riser terminating at least two (2) feet above the ground surface with a three-quarter (3/4) inch valved outlet to which is attached a flexible hose.

The water supply to the flushing device shall be protected from backflow by means of a listed vacuum breaker located downstream from the last shutoff valve.

Adjacent to the flushing arrangement there shall be posted a sign of durable material, not less than two (2) feet by two (2) feet in size, and inscribed in clearly legible letters with the following: “DANGER — NOT TO BE USED FOR DRINKING OR DOMESTIC PURPOSES” or other similar warning.

There shall not be any cross-connection between the holding tank flushing facilities and the potable water system. If the flushing facilities do not have a separate water source entirely, such facilities shall be separated from any potable system by an air gap or a backflow device.

Sanitary facilities:

Toilets shall be provided at one or more locations in every recreational vehicle park or campground, except at primitive and semi-primitive campgrounds.

In recreational vehicle parks and semi-developed and developed campgrounds, a minimum of one toilet shall be provided for each sex up to the first twenty-five (25) dependent sites. For each additional twenty-five (25) dependent sites, not provided with sewer connections, an additional toilet for each sex shall be provided. No public toilets are required if all sites serve only self-contained recreational vehicles.

Chemical and recirculating toilets shall be of an approved type.

Where provided, porta-johns shall be an approved type.

Toilet facilities shall have convenient access and shall be located within a five-hundred-foot (500) radius from any camping units not provided with individual sewer connections.

If water flush toilets are provided, an equal number of lavatories shall be provided for each two (2) toilets, when more than six (6) toilets are required. Each lavatory basin shall have a piped supply of potable water and shall drain into the sewage system.

If separate facilities are provided for men and women, urinals shall be acceptable for no more than one-third (1/3) of the toilets required in the men’s facilities.

Each female toilet room shall be provided with a receptacle for sanitary napkins. The receptacle shall be durable, nonpervious, and readily cleanable material and should be provided with a lid.

Toilets shall be of a listed type and shall be provided with seats with open fronts.

Each toilet shall be in a separate compartment and shall be provided with a door and latch for privacy and a holder or dispenser for toilet paper. Dividing walls or partitions shall be at least five (5) feet high and, if separated from the floor, shall be by a space of no more than twelve (12) inches.

Toilet compartments shall be not less than thirty (30) inches in width and there shall be not less than thirty (30) inches of clear space in front of each toilet.

Each toilet building shall have a minimum ceiling height of seven (7) feet.

Facilities for males and females shall be appropriately marked, including “unisex” facilities, where provided.

Unless artificial light is provided, the total window or skylight area shall be equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the floor area.

Unless provided with a listed mechanical ventilation system, every toilet room shall have permanent, nonclosable, screened opening(s) with a total area of not less than five percent (5%) of the floor area, opening directly to the exterior in order to provide proper ventilation. Listed exhaust fan(s), vented to the exterior, the rating of which in cubic foot per minute is at least twenty-five percent of the total volume of the toilet room(s) served, shall be considered as meeting the requirements of this subsection.

All windows and vents opening to the outside shall be provided with fly-proof screens of not less than No. 16 mesh.

All doors to the exterior shall open outward, shall be self-closing, and shall be visually screened by means of a vestibule or wall to prevent direct view of the interior when the exterior doors are open. Such screening shall not be required on single-toilet units.

The interior finish of walls shall be moisture resistant to a height of four (4) feet to facilitate washing and cleaning.

The floors shall be constructed of materials impervious to water and shall be easily cleanable. Any toilet building having flush toilets shall be provided with a floor drain in the toilet room. This drain shall be provided with a means to protect the trap seal as required by this code.

Showers: Showers and shower dressing areas shall be built to code. All shower compartments, regardless of shape, shall have a minimum finished interior of one thousand twenty-four (1,024) square inches (0.66m2) and shall be capable of encompassing a thirty-inch (30) (762mm) circle. The minimum required area and dimensions shall be measured at a height equal to the top of the threshold and at a point tangent to its centerline. Each shower shall be designed to minimize the flow of water into the dressing area and shall be properly connected to the sewage system by means of a trapped inlet.

If showers are provided, an individual dressing area, visually screened from view, shall also be provided with a minimum floor area of thirty-six (36) inches by thirty-six (36) inches (0.9m by 0.9m) and such dressing areas shall be equipped with a minimum of one clothing hook and one stool (or equivalent bench area).

The floor of showers and dressing areas shall have an impervious, skid-resistant surface.

Open showers provided exclusively for the removal of sand, etc., following beach activities, need not comply with the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 56.

32-7-12.
Refuse disposal standards.

Facilities for the storage, collection, and disposal of refuse shall be provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-13.
Recreational vehicle park and campground operation.

Rules/policies: Any operator of a recreational vehicle park or campground may establish reasonable rules and regulations for the management of the establishment and its guests and employees, and each guest or employee staying or employed in the establishment shall conform to and abide by such rules and regulations, so long as the guest or employee shall remain in or at the recreational vehicle park or campground. Such rules and regulations shall control the liabilities, responsibilities, and obligations of all parties. The rules and regulations established pursuant to this section shall be printed in a readable form to allow reasonable communications with the guests and shall be available in the office to recreational vehicle users and campers.

Fees: In each recreational vehicle park or campground, there shall be made available to recreational vehicle users and campers in the registration area, the rates at which each site is rented. This rate sheet shall indicate the amount charged for occupancy, for extra conveniences, for extra people, for more complete accommodations, or for additional furnishings, and the dates during the year when such charges apply.

Evictions: The owner or agent of any recreational vehicle park or campground may remove, or cause to be removed, from such facility, in the manner provided by law, any guest of the recreational vehicle, park or campground who, while on the premises of the facility, disturbs the peace and comfort of other persons, causes harm to the physical establishment, fails to follow rules, policies, or regulations, or fails to make payment of rent. In addition to grounds for eviction established by law, grounds for eviction may be established in a written agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-14.
Administration and enforcement.

The local permitting authority shall be responsible for enforcing compliance with the standards adopted in this chapter during its review of plans for the recreational vehicle park or campground. The arrangement of each recreational vehicle park and campground shall meet the specific approval of the chief of the fire department, forest ranger, warden, or other authority responsible for providing the necessary fire protection services. A site plan shall be supplied to the fire and law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction. To facilitate the response by emergency services such as fire police and ambulance, the sites plan shall indicate, at a minimum, the location of all camping unit sites, major buildings and facilities, and water supplies for fire protection purposes in the recreational vehicle park or campground.

Every recreational vehicle park or campground shall be required to obtain from the authority having jurisdiction a license to do business. Such licenses shall be effective for a period of time to be determined by the local licensing board. The conditions of issuance of the license shall be that the recreational vehicle park or campground be in conformity with the appropriate health and safety regulations imposed by the state of Rhode Island and the local authority having jurisdiction.

It is the duty of each operator of a recreational vehicle park or campground to maintain, at all times, registration receipts, signed by or for guests within the facility showing the dates upon which the sites were occupied by each guest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.

32-7-15.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 1.